Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 1 Scope of Code

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2003, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, requests Congress to equalize the tax treatment of employer-provided and individually purchased health insurance by creating a tax credit for the full amount of insurance purchased by individuals since the high cost of health insurance has created a large number of uninsured citizens in the United States and the State, those without health insurance are less likely to receive adequate health care, insurance purchasing decisions are to a large extent made by employers and not insurance beneficiaries, overreliance on employer-provided health insurance impedes worker mobility, spiraling health care costs are in part caused by a lack of active consumer participation in health care markets, and employers can deduct the full cost of employee health insurance as a business expense, while individuals may not.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 23 to 68.

44 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 74 to 84.

§ 26-1-101.
Short title.

This act [title 26] constitutes the Wyoming Insurance Code.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-1; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Stated

in

State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Moriarity v. State ex rel. McBride, 899 P.2d 879,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is medical expense “incurred” under policy providing for payment of medical expenses incurred within fixed period of time from date of injury, 65 ALR5th 649.

§ 26-1-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adjuster” means any individual who either investigates and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts. An attorney-at-law who is licensed to practice law in this state, or a licensed agent or broker who adjusts or assists in adjustment of losses arising under policies issued through that broker or by the insurer represented by that agent, is not an adjuster for the purposes of chapter 9 of this code;

“Agent” means any individual, firm or corporation appointed by an insurer to solicit applications for insurance or annuities or to negotiate insurance or annuities on its behalf;

“Alien” insurer means an insurer formed under the laws of any country other than the United States of America or any of its states;

“Annuity” means a contract under which obligations are assumed with respect to periodic payments where the making or continuance of all or some of the payments, or the amount of the payments, is dependent upon the continuance of human life, and a contract which includes extra benefits of the kinds set forth in W.S.

26-5-102

and

26-5-103

is an annuity if the extra benefits constitute a subsidiary or incidental part of the entire contract;

“Authorized” insurer means an insurer authorized by a subsisting certificate of authority issued by the commissioner to transact insurance in this state;

“Broker”, except as used in chapter 11 of this code, means a resident individual, firm or corporation organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming who, not being an agent of the insurer, as an independent contractor and on behalf of the insured, for compensation or fee solicits, negotiates or procures insurance or the renewal or continuance thereof for insureds or prospective insureds, other than himself;

“Charter” means articles of incorporation, agreement or association, charter granted by legislative act, or other basic constituent document of a corporation or the power of attorney of the attorney-in-fact of a reciprocal insurer;

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner of this state;

“Department” means the department of insurance of this state, unless the context otherwise requires;

“Domestic” insurer means an insurer formed under the laws of Wyoming;

“Domicile” of an insurer means:

As to Canadian insurers, Canada and the province in which the insurer’s head office is located;

As to other alien insurers authorized to transact insurance in one (1) or more states as provided in W.S.

26-3-130

;

As to alien insurers not authorized to transact insurance in one (1) or more states, the country under the laws of which the insurer was formed;

As to all other insurers, the state under the laws of which the insurer was formed.

“Foreign insurer” means an insurer formed under the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state and includes an “alien” insurer unless otherwise distinguished by the context;

“General lines agent” means an agent who transacts any of the following kinds of insurance:

Property insurance;

Casualty insurance;

Surety insurance;

Marine and transportation insurance;

Disability insurance, if transacted for an insurer also represented by the same agent as to property or casualty insurance.

“Industrial life insurance” means life insurance written under policies of face amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or less bearing the words “industrial policy” imprinted on the face of the policy and under which premiums are payable monthly or more often;

“Insurance” means a contract in which one undertakes to indemnify another against loss, damage or liability arising from determinable hazards or fortuitous occurrences or to pay or allow a specified amount or determinable benefit in connection with ascertainable risk contingencies;

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

26-22-501

through

26-22-503

, “insurer” means any person engaged as indemnitor, surety or contractor in the business of entering into contracts of insurance or of annuity;

“Life agent” means an agent who transacts life insurance or annuity business and includes also the transaction of disability insurance on behalf of an insurer for whom the agent is also licensed as to life insurance;

“Managing general agent” means a person, firm, association or corporation meeting the definition of managing general agent under W.S.

26-46-101

;

“Mutual insurer” means an incorporated insurer without capital stock and the governing body of which is elected by its policyholders, except certain foreign insurers which the commissioner finds to be organized on the mutual plan under the laws of their state or province of domicile, but having temporary share capital or providing for election of the insurer’s governing body on a reasonable basis by members or by policyholders and others are not excluded as mutual insurers;

Except as used in chapter 31 of this code, “person” means an individual, insurer, company, association, organization, Lloyd’s insurer, society, reciprocal insurer or interinsurance exchange, partnership, syndicate, business trust, corporation, agent, general agent, broker, adjuster and any legal entity;

“Policy” means the written contract of or written agreement for or effecting insurance, by whatever name called, and includes all clauses, riders, endorsements and papers which are a part thereof;

“Premium” means the consideration for insurance, by whatever name called, and any assessment, membership, policy, survey, inspection, service or similar fee or other charge in consideration for an insurance contract is part of the premium;

“Reciprocal insurance” means insurance from an interexchange among persons, known as subscribers, of reciprocal agreements of indemnity, the interexchange being carried out through an attorney-in-fact common to all persons involved;

“Reciprocal insurer” means an unincorporated aggregation of subscribers operating individually and collectively through an attorney-in-fact to provide reciprocal insurance among themselves;

Repealed by Laws 2011, Ch. 60, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2001, Ch. 201, § 5.

“State” means any state, district, territory, commonwealth or possession of the United States of America and the Panama Canal Zone if used in a context signifying a jurisdiction other than the state of Wyoming;

“Stock insurer” means an incorporated insurer with its capital divided into shares and owned by its stockholders;

“Surplus” in any determination or statement of an insurer’s financial condition means the excess of the insurer’s assets over its liabilities as ascertained in accordance with chapter 6 of this code;

“Transact” with respect to a business of insurance means:

Solicitation or inducement;

Negotiations;

Carrying out of a contract of insurance;

Transaction of matters subsequent to the carrying out and arising out of a contract of insurance; or

Any other aspects of insurance operations to which this code applies.

“Unauthorized” insurer means an insurer not authorized as provided in paragraph (a)(v) of this section;

“This act” or “this code” means title 26 of the Wyoming statutes;

“Private health benefit plan” means any hospital or medical policy or certificate, major medical expense insurance, hospital or medical service plan contract or health maintenance organization subscriber contract. “Private health benefit plan” does not include accident only, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, long-term care or disability income insurance, policies or certificates providing coverage for a specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity or limited benefit health insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, worker’s compensation or similar insurance, automobile medical payment insurance or any hospital or medical policy, major medical expense insurance, hospital or medical service plan or contract which by contract or product design is intended to provide coverage for six (6) months or less. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the Medicaid program shall continue to obtain reimbursement recovery from all types of insurance included in this section prior to July 2, 2011;

“Public health benefit plan” means medicare, medicaid or other health benefit programs or coverages operated or maintained by any governmental entity;

“Insurance producer” means a person required to be licensed under the laws of this state to sell, solicit or negotiate insurance, including, but not limited to, agents and brokers;

“Fair value”, “fair market value” or “market value” mean fair value as determined pursuant to the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual;

“Consumer reporting agency” means any person who does any of the following:

Regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of assembling or preparing consumer reports for a monetary fee;

Obtains information primarily from sources other than insurers;

Furnishes consumer reports to other persons.

“Insurance support organization” means:

Any person who regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of assembling or collecting information about natural persons for the primary purpose of providing the information to an insurance institution or insurance producer for insurance transactions, including the furnishing of consumer reports or investigative consumer reports to an insurer or insurance producer for use in connection with an insurance transaction or the collection of personal information from insurers, insurance producers or other insurance support organizations for the purpose of detecting or preventing fraud, material misrepresentation or material nondisclosure in connection with insurance underwriting or insurance claim activity;

Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph the following persons are not considered insurance support organizations for purposes of this code:

Insurance producers;

Government institutions;

Insurers;

Medical care institutions;

Medical professionals.

“Insurance transaction” for the purposes of paragraph (xxxviii) of this subsection, means any transaction involving insurance primarily for personal, family or household needs rather than business or professional needs and which entails the determination of an individual’s eligibility for an insurance coverage, benefit or payment or the servicing of an insurance application, policy, contract or certificate;

“Investigative consumer report” means a consumer report or portion of a consumer report in which information about a natural person’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living is obtained through personal interviews with the person’s neighbors, friends, associates, acquaintances or others who may have knowledge concerning those items of information;

“NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

A natural person who engages in or conducts the “business of insurance” means a person has duties that require licensure under this code or that are a major part of a person’s duties and require specialized knowledge of insurance, which knowledge has been acquired through training and experience and is sufficient that close supervision from a person licensed under this code is not needed. A person is not engaged in the business of insurance who performs tasks often found in business offices not engaged in insurance and who requires close supervision from a person licensed under this code to engage in tasks requiring specialized insurance knowledge. A person in training who performs duties requiring specialized knowledge of insurance is not engaged in the business of insurance if that person is under close supervision from a person licensed under this code;

“Multiple employer welfare arrangement” means an employee welfare benefit plan, as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 1002, or any other arrangement which is established to provide hospital, medical or surgical benefits in the event of sickness, accident, disability or death to the employees of two (2) or more employers, which may include self employed individuals, meeting a commonality of interest test, or to the beneficiaries of these persons. This term shall include a bona fide group or association of employers authorized to establish an employee welfare benefit plan under federal law.

As used in W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

:

“Examiner” means any individual or firm authorized by the commissioner to conduct an examination under W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

;

“Person” means as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xx) and includes all affiliates of the entities referred to in that definition and air ambulance membership organizations as identified in chapter 43, article 3 of this code.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 231, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-53, 26.1-2; Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 2 to 10, 46 to 49, 97, 154 to 160, 305, 306, 338, 339, 558, 559; 1977, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

26-1-102

to 26-1-110,

26-3-101

to

26-3-104

,

26-6-104

, 26-9-102 to 26-9-108,

26-15-102

,

26-15-103

,

26-16-101

,

26-16-102

,

26-32-101

,

26-32-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 2; 1992, ch. 59, § 2; 1993, ch. 134, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 2; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; ch. 201, §§ 2, 5, 6; 2004, ch. 57, § 2; 2011, ch. 60, §§ 2, 3; ch. 165, § 1; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 125, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(xxxvii) to (xl).

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 60 §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2011, deleted “service representative” after “broker” in (a)(xx); and repealed former (a)(xxv), which read: “ ‘Service representative’ means: (A) An individual licensed as a service representative and employed on salary by an insurer or managing general agent to work with agents in soliciting, negotiating and carrying out insurance in the insurer or in the insurers represented by the managing general agent; (B) Officers and salaried nonresident traveling representatives of a mutual insurer licensed as service representatives and operating on the premium deposit plan, or of a reciprocal insurer, not using resident agents for the solicitation of business, who inspect risks or solicit insurance in this state but do not receive commissions thereon.”

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 165 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xxxiii), inserted “policies or certificates providing coverage for a specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity or limited benefit health insurance” and added the last sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xli).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(xlii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(xliii).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added “and air ambulance membership organizations as identified in chapter 43, article 3 of this code” in (b)(ii).

The 2022 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted for “either investigates and negotiates settlements relative to insurance claims or applies the factual circumstances of an insurance claim to the insurance policy provisions, or both, arising under property and casualty insurance contracts” for “, for compensation as an independent contractor, or as the employee of an independent contractor, or as a salaried employee of an insurer, or for fee or commission, on behalf of the insurer investigates and negotiates settlement of claims arising under insurance contracts, except that,” and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 46, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 165 § 2 provides:

“The provisions of this act shall only apply prospectively to any individual or group disability insurance policy issued, delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2011. Statutory provisions concerning the excepted benefits enumerated in W.S. 26-5-103(b) as amended in section 1 of this act which were enacted prior to July 2, 2011 shall remain applicable.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides:

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes § 4 effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Laws 1985, ch. 140, § 3, provides: “No provision of this act is repealed by any subsequent enactment of the legislature unless the enactment clearly indicates that repeal is intended.”

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 99 § 3, provides: "This act applies to health insurance policies issued on or after July 1, 2019."

Insurer and agent have fiduciary relationship. —

By Wyoming statute, the relationship between the insurer and its agent is defined to be a fiduciary relation. United States v. Schwab, 88 F. Supp. 2d 1275, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2903 (D. Wyo. 2000).

Defendants all stood in a fiduciary relationship to the insurance companies for which they were agents or sub-agents selling insurance on behalf of the company, and in such a fiduciary relationship the defendants had a duty to disclose material information to the insurance company that would be relevant to the insurers' decisions to issue insurance policies to life insurance policy applicants. United States v. Schwab, 88 F. Supp. 2d 1275, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2903 (D. Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

Quoted

in

State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Contracts—Enforcing a Contract to Procure Insurance when the Promisor is not an Insurance Agency or Broker, Action Ads, Inc. v. Judes, 671 P.2d 309,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 380

(Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Foreign insurance company as subject to service of process in action on policy, 44 ALR2d 416.

Activities of insurance adjusters as unauthorized practice of law, 29 ALR4th 1156.

Construction, application, and operation of state “retaliatory” statutes imposing special taxes or fees on foreign insurers doing business within the state, 30 ALR4th 873.

What is “aircraft” or the like within meaning of exclusion or exception clause of insurance policy, 39 ALR4th 214.

Who is an “executive officer” of insured within meaning of liability insurance policy, 1 ALR5th 132.

Indemnitor's liability to indemnitee for attorney's fees and expenses arising out of defense of action alleging indemnitee's negligence, 59 ALR5th 733.

Right of provider of health or medical services, as assignee of claim under ERISA (Employment Retirement Income Security Act of 1974), to maintain action against plan payor, 133 ALR Fed 109.

§ 26-1-103.
Compliance with insurance code required.

No person shall transact a business of insurance in Wyoming, or relative to a subject of insurance resident, located or to be performed in Wyoming, without complying with the applicable provisions of this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 80, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3194; C.S. 1910, § 4141; C.S. 1920, § 5286; R.S. 1931, § 57-441; C.S. 1945, § 52-1042; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-43, 26.1-3; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 11; W.S. 1977, §§

26-1-102

to 26-1-111; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

For case construing similar, repealed statute. —

See Farmers Auto. Inter-Insurance Exch. v. MacDonald, 59 Wyo. 352, 140 P.2d 905,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1943).

§ 26-1-104.
Applicability of provisions.

This code does not apply to:

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 2.

Fraternal benefit societies as identified in chapter 29 of this code, except as stated in that chapter;

Health maintenance organizations as identified in chapter 34 of this code, except as otherwise specifically provided in that chapter;

Transactions in mechanical breakdown insurance as identified in chapter 37 of this code, except as otherwise provided in that chapter;

Health care sharing ministries. As used in this section, “health care sharing ministry” means a faith-based nonprofit organization that is tax exempt under the Internal Revenue Code and which:

Coordinates financial sharing for medical expenses among willing participants in accordance with criteria established by the health care sharing ministry;

Has annual audits performed by an independent certified public accountant that are available upon request; and

Includes a written disclaimer on or accompanying all applications and guideline materials distributed by or on behalf of the organization that reads in substance: “Notice: The organization facilitating the sharing of medical expenses is not an insurance company, and neither its guidelines nor plan of operation is an insurance policy. Any assistance with your medical bills is completely voluntary. No other participant is compelled by law or otherwise to contribute toward your medical bills. Participation in the organization or a subscription to any of its documents shall not be considered to be health insurance and is not subject to the regulatory requirements or consumer protections of the Wyoming insurance code. You are personally responsible for payment of your medical bills regardless of any financial sharing you may receive from the organization for medical expenses. You are also responsible for payment of your medical bills if the organization ceases to exist or ceases to facilitate the sharing of medical expenses.”

A direct primary care agreement. A direct primary care agreement means a written agreement that:

Is between a patient or their legal representative and a health care provider;

Allows either party to terminate the agreement in writing, without penalty or payment of a termination fee, at any time or after notice as specified in the agreement which notice shall not exceed sixty (60) days;

Describes the health care services to be provided in exchange for payment of a periodic fee;

Specifies the periodic fee required and any additional fees that may be charged;

May allow the periodic fee and any additional fees to be paid by a third party;

Prohibits the provider from charging or receiving additional compensation for health care services included in the periodic fee; and

Conspicuously and prominently states that the agreement is not health insurance and does not meet any individual health insurance mandate that may be required by federal law.

Air ambulance membership organizations as identified in chapter 43, article 3 of this code, except as otherwise specifically provided in this title;

Theft protection program warranties, except as referred to in chapter 49 of this code. Theft protection program warranties shall not be considered insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-12; W.S. 1977, § 26-1-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1985, ch. 133, § 2; 1987, ch. 87, § 2; 2015 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 29, 2016; 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018; 2021 ch. 125, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015,
added (a)(v).

The 2016 amendment

, added (a)(vi).

Laws 2016, ch. 6 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 29, 2016.

The 2018 amendment,

repealed former (a)(i) which read: "Farm mutual property insurers as identified in chapter 26 of this code, except as stated in that chapter."

Laws 2018, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(vii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to throughout subsection (a), see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-1-105.
Provisions relating to particular insurance to prevail over general provisions.

Provisions of this code [title 26] relative to a particular kind of insurance or type of insurer or particular matter prevail over provisions relating to insurance in general or insurers in general or to the particular matter in general.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-14; W.S. 1977, § 26-1-113; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-1-106.
Captions or headings not to limit scope of provisions.

The scope and meaning of any provision are not limited or otherwise affected by the caption or heading of any chapter, section or provision.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 14; W.S. 1957, 26.1-14; W.S. 1977, § 26-1-114; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-1-107.
General criminal and civil penalties.

Each violation of this code [title 26] for which a greater penalty is not provided by another provision of this code or by other applicable laws of this state, in addition to any applicable prescribed denial, suspension or revocation of certificate of authority or license, is a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each violation is a separate offense.

Any person who violates, or who instructs his agent or adjuster to violate, any provision of this code, any lawful rule or final order of the commissioner or any final judgment or decree made by any court, upon the commissioner’s application, shall pay a civil penalty in an amount the commissioner determines of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each offense, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) in the aggregate for all offenses within any one (1) year period. In the case of individual agents or adjusters, the civil penalty shall be not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense or ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in the aggregate for all offenses within any one (1) year period. The penalty shall be collected from the violator and paid by the commissioner, or the appropriate court, to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

Before the commissioner imposes a civil penalty, he shall notify the person, agent or adjuster accused of a violation, in writing, stating specifically the nature of the alleged violation and fixing a time and place, at least ten (10) days from the date of the notice, when a hearing of the matter shall be held. After hearing or upon failure of the accused to appear at the hearing, the commissioner shall determine the amount of the civil penalty to be imposed in accordance with the limitations expressed in subsection (b) of this section. Each violation is a separate offense.

A civil penalty may be recovered in an action brought thereon in the name of the state of Wyoming in any court of appropriate jurisdiction, and the court may review the penalty as to both liability and reasonableness of amount.

The provisions of this section are in addition to and not instead of any other enforcement provisions contained in this code.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-15; Laws 1971, ch. 149, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-1-115; Laws 1979, ch. 148, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; 2015 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

substituted “and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “to the credit of the general fund.”

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (b).

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

Punitive damages. —

In arriving at an appropriate amount of punitive damages with respect to insurance carriers, it would be appropriate to give this section as an instruction. Farmers Ins. Exch. v. Shirley, 958 P.2d 1040,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. June 4, 1998).

Applied

in

Wyoming Ins. Dep't v. Sierra Life Ins. Co., 599 P.2d 1360,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1979); Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurer's tort liability for consequential or punitive damages for wrongful failure or refusal to defend insured, 20 ALR4th 23.

Emotional or mental distress as element of damages for liability insurer's wrongful refusal to settle, 57 ALR4th 801.

Fraud actions: Right to recover for mental or emotional distress, 11 ALR5th 88.

§ 26-1-108.
Jurisdiction of insurance department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in this section, any person or other entity which provides insurance coverage in this state for medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital or optometric expenses, whether the coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise, shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the state insurance department, unless the person or other entity shows that while providing the services it is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of another agency of this state or the federal government.

A person or entity may show that it is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of another agency of this state or the federal government, by providing to the insurance commissioner the appropriate certificate, license or other document issued by the other governmental agency which permits or qualifies it to provide those services.

Any person or entity which is unable to show under subsection (b) of this section that it is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of another agency of this state or the federal government, shall submit to an examination by the insurance commissioner to determine the organization and solvency of the person or the entity, and to determine whether or not the person or entity complies with the applicable provisions of this code.

Any person or entity unable to show that it is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of another agency of this state or the federal government, shall be subject to all appropriate provisions of this code regarding the conduct of its business. If a person or entity is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of another agency of this state or the federal government, this fact shall be disclosed on all policy forms.

Any production agency or administrator which advertises, sells, transacts or administers the coverage in this state described in subsection (a) of this section and which is required to submit to an examination by the insurance commissioner under subsection (c) of this section, shall, if the coverage is not fully insured or otherwise fully covered by an admitted life or disability insurer, nonprofit hospital service plan, or nonprofit health care plan, advise every purchaser, prospective purchaser and covered person of such lack of insurance or other coverage. Any administrator which advertises or administers the coverage in this state described in subsection (a) of this section and which is required to submit to an examination by the insurance commissioner under subsection (c) of this section, shall advise any production agency of the elements of the coverage, including the amount of “stop-loss” insurance in effect.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 246, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).